Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-495] Decisions by guardian. Absent
a court order to the contrary, a special education decision of a guardian
appointed pursuant to chapter 560 takes precedence over that of an agent or
educational representative. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next